Hawaii statutes.
§288-8 Penalty. Any person who
violates this chapter shall be fined not more than $1,000 or imprisoned not
more than one year, or both. [L 1941, c 186, §6; RL 1945, §7435; RL 1955,
§160-147; HRS §288-8]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next